Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There are  appropriated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the  following amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Judicial compensation............... $105,930,600
(2) Operations................................. $462,852,488
(3) Mandated payments .................. $ 19,048,451
(4) State court technology
systems ..................................... $ 10,965,969
(5) Debt service .............................. $ 47,253,780
(6) Third-party debt
collection................................... $ 17,376,240
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and in-
cluding reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding lottery  funds and
federal funds not described in this section,  collected or received by the Judicial Department
for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 28,323,339
(2) Mandated payments .................. $ 752,074
(3) State Court Facilities and
Security Account ...................... $ 7,845,228
(4) State Court Technology Fund ... $ 17,169,924
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,589,232 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds other  than those described in section 2 of this 2023
Act collected or received by the Judicial Department.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the  General
Fund, the amount of $364,969 for payment of expenses of the Oregon Law Commission.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the  General
Fund, the amount of $57,343 for payment of expenses of the Council on Court Procedures.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5512 (SB 5512-A) Page 1
SECTION 6. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $8,179,037 for the purpose  of providing conciliation and mediation
services in circuit courts.
(2) The  Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall distribute the moneys appropriated un-
der this section to the counties  of this state to fund conciliation and mediation services in
circuit courts. The Chief Justice shall consult with  the presiding judges of the circuit courts
before making the distributions.
SECTION 7. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $8,179,037 for  the purpose of operating law libraries or providing
law library services.
(2) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall distribute the moneys appropriated  un-
der this section to  the counties of this state based on revenues received from filing fees
collected during the biennium ending June 30, 2023, in civil actions commenced in the circuit
court for the county.
SECTION 8. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $13,957,733 for  the purpose of funding the Legal Services Program
described in ORS 9.572.
(2) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall distribute all moneys appropriated under
this section to the Oregon State Bar in eight quarterly installments of equal amount.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses by the Judicial Department from American Rescue  Plan Act Coronavirus State
Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
and transferred to the Judicial Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Electronic records
expungement............................. $ 572,000
(2) Planning funding for
replacement of Curry County
Circuit Courthouse.................... $ 300,000
SECTION 10.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Judicial Department by  section 1 (1), chapter 557, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for judicial compensation, is decreased by $1,600,000.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (3), chapter 557,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for mandated payments, is increased by $700,000 for jury  and
interpreter expenses.
SECTION 12. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund,  the amount of $3,000,000, to be allocated to the Judicial Department for
mandated payments or third-party collections.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 13. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5512 (SB 5512-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5512 (SB 5512-A) Page 3